Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-230
County fair; county aid; restriction.

Whenever any county shall have established a county fair under the provisions of sections 2-221 to 2-231, no money shall be paid by the county to any other society or association maintaining a fair within the county.

Laws 1917, c. 168, § 11, p. 379;

C.S.1922, § 67;

C.S.1929, § 2-220;

R.S.1943, § 2-230.